Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.030

Notices, various.

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Verification notice" means a notice sent by the county auditor or secretary of state to a voter registration applicant and is used to verify or collect information about the applicant in order to complete the registration. The verification notice must be designed to include a postage prepaid, preaddressed return form by which the applicant may verify or send information.

(2) "Acknowledgment notice" means a notice sent by nonforwardable mail by the county auditor or secretary of state to a registered voter to acknowledge a voter registration transaction or an automatic voter registration transaction, which can include initial registration, residential address change, or reactivation of an inactive registration, identifying the registrant's precinct and containing such other information as may be required by the secretary of state. An acknowledgment notice may be a voter registration card.

(3) "Automatic voter registration acknowledgment notice package" means a package of information sent by nonforwardable mail by the county auditor, to a registered voter who utilized the automatic voter registration process at the department of licensing, to acknowledge a voter registration transaction, which can include initial registration, residential address change, or reactivation of an inactive registration. The package must include:

(a) A postage prepaid, preaddressed return form by which the individual may decline to be registered to vote or decline the update;

(b) A statement explaining that the person has become registered to vote or signed up to register to vote, as appropriate, setting forth the qualifications to vote, stating that if the individual does not meet the qualifications to vote, the person shall return the notice and affirmatively decline in writing to register to vote, and that if the person wishes to cancel the voter registration at any time, that the person may contact their county auditor to do so;

(c) Instructions regarding how an individual can obtain more information about the notice and assistance in the individual's preferred language, including languages as set forth in RCW 29A.08.270;

(d) An acknowledgment notice; and

(e) Other information required by the secretary of state.

(4) "Identification notice" means a notice sent to a provisionally registered voter to confirm the applicant's identity.

(5) "Confirmation notice" means a notice sent to a registered voter by first-class forwardable mail at the address indicated on the voter's permanent registration record and to any other address at which the county auditor or secretary of state could reasonably expect mail to be received by the voter in order to confirm the voter's residence address. The confirmation notice must be designed to include a postage prepaid, preaddressed return form by which the registrant may verify the address information.

[ 2023 c 466 s 3; 2009 c 369 s 7; 2005 c 246 s 3; 2004 c 267 s 104; 2003 c 111 s 203. Prior: 1994 c 57 s 33. Formerly RCW 29.10.011.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 466 ss 3, 4, 6, 11, 13-16, and 20-23: "Sections 3, 4, 6, 11, 13 through 16, and 20 through 23 of this act take effect July 15, 2024." [ 2023 c 466 s 37.]

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.